Montana, session 2025, HB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Sole constitutional authority by legislature on rules governing its proceedings --
judicial review and interpretation prohibited -- EXCEPTION. (1) Pursuant Except as provided in subsection (2),
pursuant to Article V, section 10(1), of the Montana constitution, the legislature possesses the sole power and
discretion to make, enforce, interpret, suspend, repeal, or waive rules for its proceedings, unless the rules
potentially conflict with the Montana constitution or the United States constitution.
(2) A judicial officer may not review and interpret a legislative rule unless the rule potentially
conflicts with the Montana constitution or the United States constitution.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "judicial officer" has the same meaning as provided in 1-1-
202(2).
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
5, chapter 5, and the provisions of Title 5, chapter 5, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 531
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 531, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 531
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT PROVIDING THAT THE LEGISLATURE HAS THE SOLE CONSTITUTIONAL AUTHORITY
REGARDING RULES THAT GOVERN THE LEGISLATURE'S PROCEEDINGS; PROHIBITING THE JUDICIAL
BRANCH FROM REVIEWING AND INTERPRETING LEGISLATIVE RULES; PROVIDING A DEFINITION; AND
PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”